es: Accesorios para reproductor MP3 incluidos: Cargador para automóvil; Estuche; Cable de carga; Auriculares; Auriculares; Altavoz portátil; Protector de pantalla; Soporte; Otros
zh-CN: 包括 MP3 播放器配件: 车载充电器; 盒; 充电线; 耳机; 耳机; 便携式音箱; 屏幕保护膜; 支架; 其他
th: รวมอุปกรณ์สำหรับเครื่องเล่น MP3: ที่ชาร์จในรถ; ฝาครอบ; สายชาร์จ; หูฟัง; ชุดหูฟัง; ลำโพงพกพา; ที่ป้องกันหน้าจอ; ที่ตั้ง; อื่นๆ
fr: Accessoires pour lecteur MP3 inclus: Chargeur de voiture; Boîtier; Câble de chargement; Écouteurs; Casque; Hauts-parleurs portatifs; Films de protection d'écran; Support; Autre
ja: MP3プレーヤー関連商品 (詳細): 車の充電器; ケース; 充電ケーブル; イヤホン; ヘッドセット; ポータブルスピーカー; 画面保護シート; スタンド; その他
lt-LT: Į komplektą įeinantys MP3 grotuvo priedai: Automobilio įkroviklis; Dėklas; Įkrovimo kabelis; Į ausis įkišamos ausinės; Ausinės; Nešiojamas garsiakalbis; Ekrano apsauga; Stovas; Kita
fi: Mukana MP3-soitintarvikkeita: Autolaturi; Kotelo; Latausjohto; Kuulokkeet; Kuulokkeet; Kannettavat kaiuttimet; Näyttösuoja; Jalusta; Muu
pt-BR: Acessórios para leitor de MP3 incluídos: Carregador de carro; Caixa; Cabos de carregamento; Fones de ouvido; Fone de ouvido; Alto-falante portátil; Protetor de tela; Suporte; Outro
it: Accessori per lettore MP3 inclusi: Caricabatteria per auto; Involucro; Cavo di ricarica; Auricolari; Cuffia; Altoparlante portatile; Proteggi schermo; Supporto; Altro
sv: Tillbehör till MP3-spelare ingår: Billaddare; Låda; Laddningskabel; Hörlurar; Headset; Bärbar högtalare; Skärmskydd; Stativ; Övrigt
de: Inbegriffenes MP3-Player-Zubehör: Auto-Ladegerät; Kiste; Ladekabel; Kopfhörer; Headset; Tragbarer Lautsprecher; Bildschirmschutz; Ständer; Sonstiges
nb: Inkludert tilbehør til MP3-spiller: Billader; Hylse; Ladekabel; Øretelefoner; Hodesett; Bærbar høyttaler; Skjermbeskytter; Stativ; Annet
cs: Obsažené příslušenství k přehrávači MP3: Nabíječka do auta; Pouzdro; Nabíjecí kabel; Sluchátka; Headset; Přenosný reproduktor; Chránič obrazovky; Stojan; Jiné
ru: Принадлежности для MP3-плеера в комплекте: Автомобильное зарядное устройство; Чехол; Зарядный кабель; Наушники; Гарнитура; Портативная колонка; Защитная пленка для экрана; Подставка; Другой
ko: MP3 플레이어 부대용품 포함: 차량 충전기; 케이스; 충전 케이블; 이어폰; 헤드셋; 휴대용 스피커; 화면 보호기; 스탠드; 기타
el: Περιλαμβάνονται αξεσουάρ MP3 player: Φορτιστής αυτοκινήτου; Θήκη; Καλώδιο φόρτισης; Ακουστικά ψείρες; Κάσκα ακουστικών; Φορητό ηχείο; Προστατευτικό οθόνης; Κατακόρυφη; Άλλο
hu: Mellékelt MP3-lejátszóhoz használható tartozékok: Autós töltő; Tok; Töltőkábel; Fülhallgató; Fejhallgató; Hordozható hangszóró; Képernyővédő; Állvány; Egyéb
pl: Dołączone akcesoria do odtwarzacza MP3: Ładowarka samochodowa; Obudowa; Kabel do ładowania; Słuchawki douszne; Słuchawki nagłowne; Przenośny głośnik; Osłona ekranu; Statyw; Inne
nl: Inclusief accessoires MP3-speler: Autolader; Doos; Oplaadkabel; Oortelefoon; Headset; Draagbare luidspreker; Schermbeschermer; Standaard; Andere
zh-TW: 包括 MP3 播放器配件: 車用充電器; 外殼; 充電線; 耳機; 一副耳機; 攜帶式喇叭; 螢幕保護膜; 立架; 其他
sk-SK: Vrátane príslušenstva k MP3 prehrávaču: Nabíjačka do auta; Puzdro; Nabíjací kábel; Slúchadlá; Náhlavná súprava; Prenosný reproduktor; Ochrana obrazovky; Stojan; Iné
pt-PT: Acessórios para leitor MP3 incluídos: Carregador para carros; Revestimento; Cabo de carregamento; Auriculares; Auscultadores; Altifalante portátil; Protetor de ecrã; Suporte; Outro
ro-RO: Accesorii pentru player MP3 incluse: Încărcător auto; Casetă; Cablu de încărcare; Căști auriculare; Căști; Difuzor portabil; Protecție pentru ecran; Suport; Altele
vi: Phụ kiện máy nghe nhạc MP3 đi kèm: Tẩu sạc; Hộp đựng; Cáp sạc; Tai nghe nhét tai; Tai nghe có micrô; Loa di động; Miếng dán bảo vệ màn hình; Giá đỡ; Khác
da: MP3-afspillertilbehør inkluderet: Biloplader; Kasse; Ladekablel; Høretelefoner; Headset; Bærbar højttaler; Skærmbeskytter; Stativ; Andet
tr: MP3 çalar aksesuarları dahil: Araç içi şarj cihazı; Kılıf; Şarj kablosu; Kulaklıklar; Kulaklık; Taşınabilir hoparlör; Ekran koruyucu; Stant; Diğer
sl-SI: Vključeni dodatki za MP3 predvajalnik: Avtomobilski polnilec; Etui; Polnilni kabel; Slušalke; Naglavne slušalke; Prenosni zvočnik; Zaščita zaslona; Stojalo; Drugo
hr-HR: Uključeni dodaci za MP3 uređaj: Automobilski punjač; Etui; Kabel za punjenje; Slušalice; Slušalice s mikrofonom; Prijenosni zvučnik; Zaštita za ekran; Stalak; Ostalo
en: MP3 player accessories included: Car charger; Case; Charging cable; Earphones; Headset; Portable speaker; Screen protector; Stand; Other
bg-BG: Включени аксесоари за MP3 плейър: Зарядно устройство за кола; Калъф; Кабел за зареждане; Слушалки; Слушалка; Преносим високоговорител; Екранен протектор; Стойка; Други